Utah statutes.
73-5-8.   Reports by users to engineer.

Every person using water from any river system or water source, when requested by the state engineer, shall within 30 days after such request report to the state engineer in writing:

(1)  the nature of the use of any such water;

(2)  the area on which used;

(3)  the kind of crops to be grown; and

(4)  water elevations on wells or tunnels and quantity of underground water used.



Amended by Chapter 215, 2005 General Session

